Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-313 Directors. (a) No
individual shall be a director of a domestic mutual insurer by reason of the
individual's holding public office (i.e. ex officio).

(b) An individual is disqualified from being
or acting as a director if such person:

(1) Is adjudged as a bankrupt;

(2) Took the benefit of any insolvency law; or

(3) Made a general assignment for the benefit of
creditors. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next